DTC P2147 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]
id0102f1957700
DTC P2147 |
Fuel injector supply circuit low input |
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DETECTION CONDITION
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• The PCM monitors the fuel injector circuit voltage while the engine switch is on. If the PCM detects the circuit voltage is less than threshold when the fuel injector does not inject the fuel, the PCM determines that there is a malfunction in the fuel injector circuit.
Diagnostic support note
• The MIL illuminates if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition during the first drive cycle.
• The FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
• The DTC is stored in the PCM memory.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• Fuel injector malfunction
• Connector or terminal malfunction
• Short to ground in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.1 terminal B and PCM terminal 42
• Short to ground in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.2 terminal B and PCM terminal 21
• Short to ground in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.3 terminal B and PCM terminal 23
• Short to ground in the wiring harness between the fuel injector No.4 terminal B and PCM terminal 40
• PCM malfunction
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Diagnostic procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
ACTION |
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1
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VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
• Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
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2
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VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
• Verify related Service Information availability.
• Is any related repair information available?
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Yes
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Perform the repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
• If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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3
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VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
• Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERN TROUBLESHOOTING”.
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4
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INSPECT FUEL INJECTOR CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch to off.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected terminal, then go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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5
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INSPECT SUCTION CONTROL VALVE CIRCUIT FOR A SHORT TO GROUND
• Turn the engine switch to off.
• Inspect for continuity between the fuel injector No.1—No.4 terminals B and body ground.
• Is there continuity?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the wiring harness for a short to ground, then go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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6
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INSPECT FUEL INJECTOR
• Inspect the fuel injector.
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Replace the fuel injector, then go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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7
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INSPECT PCM CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch to off.
• Inspect for poor connection. (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected terminal, then go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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8
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VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P2147 COMPLETED
• Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Replace the PCM, then go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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9
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VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
• Perform the Repair Verification Drive Mode.
• Are any DTCs present?
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Yes
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Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
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No
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Troubleshooting completed.
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